Utah statutes.
10-2-701.   Petition for disincorporation -- Validity -- District court order for election.

Disincorporation of a municipality shall be initiated upon petition.  The petition shall bear signatures equal in number to 25% of all votes cast from the municipality at the last congressional election. No signature is valid, for purposes of this section, unless it is that of a registered voter who is a resident of the municipality proposed for disincorporation.

The petition containing the specified number of signatures shall be filed with the county clerk for validation by that officer. If the county clerk finds the petition valid, the clerk shall file the original with the district court and furnish a copy to the governing body of the municipality.

The district court, upon determining that the petition comports with Section 10-2-701.5 and that it does not offend Section 10-2-710 and is otherwise complete, shall order that the question of dissolution be placed before the voters of the municipality.



Enacted by Chapter 55, 1981 General Session

